Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-117.03
Adoption assistance payments; cease;
when; exceptions.

Payment of adoption assistance provided for by section 43-117
ceases upon the death of the adoptive parent or parents except (1) in cases
in which the adoption assistance agreement provides for assignment to a guardian
or conservator or (2) for up to six months pending the appointment of a guardian
or conservator if the child is placed in the temporary custody of a family
member or other individual.

Payment of
adoption assistance provided by section 43-117 ceases upon placement of the
child with the Department of Health and Human Services or a child placement
agency.

Laws 2012, LB1062, § 2.